Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-207] Minimum capital and surplus.
A special purpose financial captive insurance company shall not be issued a
license unless it possesses and thereafter maintains unimpaired capital and
surplus of not less than $250,000 in the form of cash or other assets approved
by the commissioner. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next